Idaho statutes. Title 1 COURTS AND COURT OFFICIALS
Chapter 20 JUDGES’ RETIREMENT AND COMPENSATION
§ 1-2005. Senior judge — Assignment — Duties and powers — Compensation and expenses — Qualifications and oath.

A justice or judge who leaves office or retires from the supreme court, court of appeals or a district court, except a justice or judge retired under the provisions of section 1-2001(4), Idaho Code, may be designated a senior judge of the state of Idaho by the supreme court.

Upon filing with the secretary of state an oath of office as a senior judge as prescribed in subsection (7) of this section, a senior judge is eligible for temporary assignment by the supreme court to a state court as provided in this subsection, whenever the supreme court determines that the assignment is reasonably necessary and will promote the more efficient administration of justice. A senior judge may sit as a district or magistrate judge of the district court of any county or may sit with the supreme court or court of appeals or may perform such other duties pertaining to the judicial department of government as may be requested.

The assignment of a senior judge shall be made by an order which shall designate the court or duties to which the judge is assigned and the duration of the assignment. Promptly after assignment of a senior judge under this section, the supreme court shall cause a certified copy of the order to be sent to the senior judge and another certified copy to the court to which the judge is assigned.

Each senior judge assigned as provided in this section has all the judicial powers and duties, while serving under the assignment, of a regularly qualified judge of the court to which the senior judge is assigned.

A senior judge assigned as provided in this section, other than one performing services required by section 1-2001(2)(b), Idaho Code, shall receive as compensation for each day the senior judge is actually engaged in the performance of duties under the assignment an amount equal to eighty-five percent (85%) of the daily salary of the highest office in which the senior judge served. However, a retired judge shall not receive for services as a senior judge during any fiscal year a sum of money which when added to the amount of any judicial retirement pay received by the senior judge for the year exceeds the current annual salary of the highest office in which the senior judge served; except that this limitation shall not apply if the chief justice of the supreme court determines that extended service by one (1) or more senior judges is required because of extraordinary circumstances, such as a natural disaster or a judge’s absence from service due to military service or medical disability. Services by a senior judge under an assignment and receipt of compensation for services shall not reduce or otherwise affect the amount of any retirement pay to which the senior judge otherwise would be entitled. Such additional compensation above the retirement compensation benefits accruing to such senior judge shall be paid from the general fund in accordance with appropriations provided by the legislature.

A senior judge assigned to a court located outside the county in which the senior judge regularly resides shall receive, in addition to any daily compensation, reimbursement for traveling and subsistence expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of duties under the assignment. The expenses shall be paid upon presentation of an itemized statement of the expenses, certified by the senior judge to be correct.

To be eligible for assignment, a senior judge must: maintain a residence within the state; comply with all applicable provisions of the Idaho code of judicial conduct; and take, subscribe and file with the secretary of state, the following oath or affirmation:“I, ..............., do solemnly swear (or affirm, as the case may be) that as a senior judge of the state of Idaho, I will support the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of the State of Idaho, and that upon hereafter accepting any assignment to serve as a judge of a court of this state I will faithfully discharge the duties thereof to the best of my ability.”.

Except as provided in section 1-2001(2)(b), Idaho Code, any period of service rendered by a senior judge shall not in any way be computed for additional retirement benefits, and the state controller shall not receive or deduct any sum for transfer to the judges’ retirement fund or to the public employee retirement system of Idaho.

§ 1-2006. Application of act.

Chapter 20, title 1, Idaho Code, shall operate prospectively in its application as to all persons who are receiving retirement benefits thereunder, provided that the Supreme Court may by order apply all of the provisions of this chapter to service under section 1-611, Idaho Code.

In no case shall any justice or judge, serving at the time this act becomes effective, receive and have paid to him, at the time of his retirement, retirement compensation in any lesser amount than he would have become entitled to receive and have paid to him under the act as it existed prior to this amendment.

§ 1-2007. Age limit

Eligibility to service as justice or judge. [Repealed.]

§ 1-2008. Investment of judges’ retirement fund.

The retirement board shall select and contract with investment managers registered with the securities and exchange commission to manage the investment of the judges’ retirement fund. The investment managers shall, subject to the direction of the board, exert control over the funds as though the investment managers were the owners thereof and are hereby authorized to invest the judges’ retirement fund as hereinafter provided.

The retirement board shall formulate an investment policy governing the investment of judges’ retirement funds. The policy shall pertain to the types, kinds or nature of investment of any of the funds, and any limitations, conditions or restrictions upon the methods, practices or procedures for investment, reinvestments, purchases, sales or exchange transactions.

In acquiring, investing, reinvesting, exchanging, retaining, selling and managing the moneys and securities of the fund, investment managers shall also be governed by the prudent man investment act, sections 68-501 through 68-506, Idaho Code; provided, however, that the retirement board may in its sole discretion, limit the types, kinds and amounts of such investments.

The retirement board shall adopt the actuarial tables and assumptions in use by the judges’ retirement fund and may change the same in its sole discretion at any time.

The retirement board is hereby authorized to select and contract with a bank or trust company authorized to do business in the state of Idaho, to act as custodian of the judges’ retirement fund, who shall hold all securities and moneys of the judges’ retirement fund and shall collect the principal, dividends and interest thereof when due and pay the same into the judges’ retirement fund.

The state treasurer shall pay all warrants drawn on the judges’ retirement fund for making such investments when issued pursuant to vouchers approved by the retirement board.

§ 1-2008. Investment of judges’ retirement fund.

The retirement board shall select and contract with investment managers registered with the securities and exchange commission to manage the investment of the judges’ retirement fund. The investment managers shall, subject to the direction of the board, exert control over the funds as though the investment managers were the owners thereof and are hereby authorized to invest the judges’ retirement fund as hereinafter provided.

The retirement board shall formulate an investment policy governing the investment of judges’ retirement funds. The policy shall pertain to the types, kinds or nature of investment of any of the funds, and any limitations, conditions or restrictions upon the methods, practices or procedures for investment, reinvestments, purchases, sales or exchange transactions.

In acquiring, investing, reinvesting, exchanging, retaining, selling and managing the moneys and securities of the fund, investment managers shall also be governed by the prudent man investment act, sections 68-501 through 68-506, Idaho Code; provided, however, that the retirement board may in its sole discretion, limit the types, kinds and amounts of such investments.

The retirement board shall adopt the actuarial tables and assumptions in use by the judges’ retirement fund and may change the same in its sole discretion at any time.

The retirement board is hereby authorized to select and contract with a bank or trust company authorized to do business in the state of Idaho, to act as custodian of the judges’ retirement fund, who shall hold all securities and moneys of the judges’ retirement fund and shall collect the principal, dividends and interest thereof when due and pay the same into the judges’ retirement fund.

The state treasurer shall pay all warrants drawn on the judges’ retirement fund for making such investments when issued pursuant to vouchers approved by the retirement board.

§ 1-2008A. Investment trustee. [Repealed.]

§ 1-2009. Benefit to surviving spouse of justice or judge.

The legislature hereby finds and declares that the payment of allowances to the surviving spouses of justices of the supreme court, judges of the court of appeals and district judges of the district court of the state of Idaho, serves the public purpose of promoting the public welfare by encouraging experienced jurists to continue their service and that their continued service and increased efficiency will be secured in the expectation that the legislature will fairly provide for their surviving spouses, and that such continued service and increased efficiency of such jurists, secure in this knowledge, will be of substantial benefit to the state.

The surviving spouse, of any justice or judge entitled to benefits under this chapter who dies on or after July 1, 1965, shall receive an allowance from the judges’ retirement fund, payable monthly, and as hereinafter provided.

In the case of a justice or judge receiving retirement compensation at the time of death, allowance to his surviving spouse shall commence immediately and be payable to such spouse from such fund in an amount equal to fifty percent (50%) of the retirement compensation to which such justice or judge would be entitled under section 1-2001(2), Idaho Code; provided, that the allowance payable to the surviving spouse of a justice or judge who first assumed the office of supreme court justice, judge of the court of appeals or district judge on or after July 1, 2012, shall be thirty percent (30%) of the retirement compensation to which such justice or judge would be entitled.

In the case of a justice or judge who has service as a justice of the supreme court, judge of the court of appeals or district judge of four (4) years or more and is not receiving retirement compensation at the time of death, commencing immediately, the surviving spouse shall be paid an allowance from such fund in the amount of fifty percent (50%) of the retirement compensation to which the justice or judge would have been entitled under section 1-2001(2)(a), Idaho Code, as if the justice or judge was eligible to retire and had retired immediately before his death; provided, that the allowance payable to the surviving spouse of a justice or judge who first assumed the office of supreme court justice, judge of the court of appeals or district judge on or after July 1, 2012, shall be thirty percent (30%) of the retirement compensation to which such justice or judge would have been entitled, as if the justice or judge was eligible to retire and had retired immediately before his death.

The allowance shall be paid until the death of the surviving spouse.

The surviving spouse of a justice or judge who is not receiving benefits from the judges’ retirement fund at the time of the justice’s or judge’s death may elect to take an optional retirement allowance as a surviving annuitant under option 1 of section 1-2001b(1)(a), Idaho Code. Such optional retirement allowance shall be calculated as if the justice or judge was eligible to retire and had retired immediately before his death.

§ 1-2009. Benefit to surviving spouse of justice or judge.

The legislature hereby finds and declares that the payment of allowances to the surviving spouses of justices of the supreme court, judges of the court of appeals and district judges of the district court of the state of Idaho, serves the public purpose of promoting the public welfare by encouraging experienced jurists to continue their service and that their continued service and increased efficiency will be secured in the expectation that the legislature will fairly provide for their surviving spouses, and that such continued service and increased efficiency of such jurists, secure in this knowledge, will be of substantial benefit to the state.

The surviving spouse, of any justice or judge entitled to benefits under this chapter who dies on or after July 1, 1965, shall receive an allowance from the judges’ retirement fund, payable monthly, and as hereinafter provided.

In the case of a justice or judge receiving retirement compensation at the time of death, allowance to his surviving spouse shall commence immediately and be payable to such spouse from such fund in an amount equal to fifty percent (50%) of the retirement compensation to which such justice or judge would be entitled under section 1-2001(2), Idaho Code; provided, that the allowance payable to the surviving spouse of a justice or judge who first assumed the office of supreme court justice, judge of the court of appeals or district judge on or after July 1, 2012, shall be thirty percent (30%) of the retirement compensation to which such justice or judge would be entitled.

In the case of a justice or judge who has service as a justice of the supreme court, judge of the court of appeals or district judge of four (4) years or more and is not receiving retirement compensation at the time of death, commencing immediately, the surviving spouse shall be paid an allowance from such fund in the amount of fifty percent (50%) of the retirement compensation to which the justice or judge would have been entitled under section 1-2001(2)(a), Idaho Code, as if the justice or judge was eligible to retire and had retired immediately before his death; provided, that the allowance payable to the surviving spouse of a justice or judge who first assumed the office of supreme court justice, judge of the court of appeals or district judge on or after July 1, 2012, shall be thirty percent (30%) of the retirement compensation to which such justice or judge would have been entitled, as if the justice or judge was eligible to retire and had retired immediately before his death.

The allowance shall be paid until the death of the surviving spouse.

The surviving spouse of a justice or judge who is not receiving benefits from the judges’ retirement fund at the time of the justice’s or judge’s death may elect to take an optional retirement allowance as a surviving annuitant under option 1 of section 1-2001b(1)(a), Idaho Code. Such optional retirement allowance shall be calculated as if the justice or judge was eligible to retire and had retired immediately before his death.

§ 1-2010. Death benefit.

The death benefit of a deceased justice or judge is the excess, if any, of the justice’s or judge’s accumulated contributions to the judges’ retirement fund, including accrued interest at the rate provided in section 1-2001(5), Idaho Code, over the aggregate of all retirement compensation payments and allowances ever made to the justice, judge, spouse or annuitant from the judges’ retirement fund.

The death benefit is payable, and all other retirement compensation benefits and allowances shall cease, upon the death of the justice, judge, spouse or annuitant receiving a retirement compensation or allowance.

The death benefit shall be paid to the beneficiary named by the justice or judge in a written designation of beneficiary on file with the retirement board if the beneficiary is surviving at the time the death benefit is payable; otherwise the death benefit shall be paid to the estate of the deceased justice or judge for distribution in accordance with the laws of descent and distribution of the state of Idaho as they may then be in effect.

§ 1-2010. Death benefit.

The death benefit of a deceased justice or judge is the excess, if any, of the justice’s or judge’s accumulated contributions to the judges’ retirement fund, including accrued interest at the rate provided in section 1-2001(5), Idaho Code, over the aggregate of all retirement compensation payments and allowances ever made to the justice, judge, spouse or annuitant from the judges’ retirement fund.

The death benefit is payable, and all other retirement compensation benefits and allowances shall cease, upon the death of the justice, judge, spouse or annuitant receiving a retirement compensation or allowance.

The death benefit shall be paid to the beneficiary named by the justice or judge in a written designation of beneficiary on file with the retirement board if the beneficiary is surviving at the time the death benefit is payable; otherwise the death benefit shall be paid to the estate of the deceased justice or judge for distribution in accordance with the laws of descent and distribution of the state of Idaho as they may then be in effect.

§ 1-2011. Election to continue participation in the public employee retirement system of Idaho.

On and after July 1, 1998, any vested member of the public employee retirement system of Idaho may, within thirty (30) days of becoming a justice of the supreme court, judge of the court of appeals or district judge in the state of Idaho, make a one-time irrevocable election to continue participation as an active member of that system in lieu of participation in the judges’ retirement fund established in this chapter and the justice, judge or spouse shall not be entitled to any compensation, benefits or allowances under any provision of this chapter. An election must be in writing and must be provided to both the supreme court and the public employee retirement system of Idaho. Once an election is made, all service as justice or judge, including noncontinuous service, shall be accrued to the public employee retirement system of Idaho, and shall be governed under the provisions of that system, except as provided in section 1-2005, Idaho Code.

§ 1-2012. Rules and administrative policies.

Subject to the other provisions of this chapter, the retirement board shall have the power and authority to adopt, amend and rescind such rules and administrative policies as may be necessary for the proper administration of this chapter.